esu.stress.twol
! LANGUAGE: "esu"
! AUTHOR: "Lonny Strunk"

Alphabet
    a c e g i k l m n p q r s t u v w y m̄ n̄
    vv ll ss gg rr ng n͞g u͡g u͡gg u͡r u͡rr
    %[e%]
    ʼ                                           ! Keep apostrophe from lexical entries
    ạ ụ ġ                                       ! for (ar) droppping
    á í ú ạ́ ụ́ â î û ậ ụ̂ é ê
    %[é%] %[ê%]                                 ! weak initial e cannot be hatted
    %> 
    %= ;

Sets 
    B = %> ;

    Stop = p t c k q ;
    VoiceFric = v l s g r u͡g u͡r ġ ; 
    VlessFric = vv ll ss gg rr u͡gg u͡rr ;
    VoiceNasal = m n ng ;
    VlessNasal = m̄ n̄ n͞g ;

    VoiceCon = VoiceFric VoiceNasal ;
    VlessCon = VlessFric VlessNasal Stop ;

    Fric = VoiceFric VlessFric ;
    Nasal = VoiceNasal VlessNasal ;

    Con = Stop Fric Nasal w y ;

    FVow = a i u ạ ụ ;
    FVowStress = á í ú ạ́ ụ́ ;
    FVowHatted = â î û ậ ụ̂ ;
    AllFVow = FVow FVowStress FVowHatted ;
    Vow = FVow e %[e%] ;
    VowStress = FVowStress é %[é%] ;
    VowHatted = FVowHatted ê %[ê%] ; ! weak initial e cannot be hatted
    AllVow = Vow VowStress VowHatted ;

Rules 
! From pg 55 in practical grammar book (Jacobson, 1995)

"a:â"
Vx:Vy <=> [.#.|:Con] B:* :Vow B:* :Con B:* _ ~[ B:* :Vow :* | B:* :Con B:* :Con :* | B:* :Con B:* :ʼ :* ] .#. ; !CVCV̂              ! Rule 1
    except
        _ B:* (:Vow) B:* (:Con) B:* [.#.|:%=] ;
    where Vx in Vow
          Vy in VowHatted
    matched;

"a:á"
Vx:Vy <=> :Vow B:* _ ; !VV́(C)                                                                                         ! Rule 2
          [.#.|:Con] B:* _ B:* :Con B:* ([:Con|:ʼ]) B:* :Vow B:* :AllVow ; ! CV́C(C)VV́                                   ! Rule 3
          .#. (:Con) B:* _ B:* :Con B:* [:Con|:ʼ] ; ! #(C)V́C[Cʼ]                                               ! Rule 4
          [.#.|:Con|:ʼ] B:* :Vow B:* (:Con) B:* :Con B:* _ B:* :Con B:* :Con ; ! every 2nd closed syllable
          :Con B:* _ B:* :Con B:* :Con B:* :Vow B:* :Con B:* :AllVow ; ! 1st syllable if second syllable open
    except
        _ B:* (:Con) B:* [.#.|%-] ;
        [.#.|:Con] B:* :Vow B:* :Con B:* _ ~[ B:* :Vow :* | B:* :Con B:* :Con :* | B:* :Con B:* :ʼ :* ] .#. ; !CVCV̂  
    where Vx in Vow
          Vy in VowStress
    matched;
